Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-309
Core functions, defined.

Core functions means the following twelve activities an alcohol and drug counselor performs in the role of counselor: Screening, intake, orientation, assessment, treatment planning, counseling (individual, group, and significant others), case management, crisis intervention, client education, referral, reports and record keeping, and consultation with other professionals in regard to client treatment and services.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 160.